Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5230
Basic health benefit plan, defined.

Basic health benefit plan shall mean a lower cost health benefit plan regulated by the board.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 9.